Massachusetts, session 194th, S450.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new section:-
Section __. School safety resource officer
The commissioner of the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
designate an individual within the department to serve as a school safety resource officer. Said
individual shall be available to provide schools with information on school safety issues and to
evaluate school safety plans.
of 1